Vermont, session 2025-2026, S228.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 904 is amended to read:
§ 904. SUBJECTS FOR BARGAINING
(a) All matters relating to the relationship between the employer and
employees shall be the subject of collective bargaining except those matters
that are prescribed or controlled by statute. The matters appropriate for
collective bargaining to the extent they are not prescribed or controlled by
statute include:
VT LEG #385474 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.228
2026 Page 2 of 3
(1) wages, salaries, benefits, and reimbursement practices relating to
necessary expenses and the limits of reimbursable expenses;
(2) minimum hours per week;
(3) working conditions;
(4) overtime compensation and related matters;
(5) leave compensation and related matters;
(6) reduction-in-force procedures;
(7) grievance procedures, including whether an appeal to the Vermont
Labor Relations Board or binding arbitration, or both, will constitute the final
step in a grievance procedure;
(8) terms of coverage and amount of employee financial participation in
insurance programs, except that the Department of State’s Attorneys and
Sheriffs and the deputy State’s Attorneys, other employees of the State’s
Attorneys’ offices, and deputy sheriffs paid by the State pursuant to 24 V.S.A.
§ 290(b) shall not bargain in relation to terms of coverage and the amount of
employee financial participation in insurance programs;
(9) rules for personnel administration, except the following: rules
relating to persons exempt from the classified service under section 311 of this
title and rules relating to applicants for employment in State service and
employees in an initial probationary status, including any extension or
extensions thereof, provided the rules are not discriminatory by reason of an
VT LEG #385474 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED S.228
2026 Page 3 of 3
applicant’s race, color, creed, sex, national origin, sexual orientation, gender
identity, ancestry, place of birth, age, or physical or mental condition; and
(10) the manner in which to enforce an employee’s obligation to pay the
collective bargaining service fee; and
(11) terms and conditions of remote, in-person, and hybrid work
standards for individuals employed on a permanent or limited-status basis by
the State of Vermont.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #385474 v.1